dicts/fur_IT/fur-IT.aff
SFX B N 71
SFX B   ê   evi   ê
SFX B   ê   evis   ê
SFX B   ê   eve   ê
SFX B   ê   evin   ê
SFX B   ê   ei   ê
SFX B   ê   eris   ê
SFX B   ê   è   ê
SFX B   ê   erin   ê
SFX B   ê   arai   ê
SFX B   ê   arâs   ê
SFX B   ê   arà   ê
SFX B   ê   arìn   ê
SFX B   ê   arês   ê
SFX B   ê   aran   ê
SFX B   ê   i   ê
SFX B   ê   edi   ê
SFX B   ê   is   ê
SFX B   ê   edis   ê
SFX B   ê   ìn   ê
SFX B   ê   edin   ê
SFX B   ê   ês   ê
SFX B   ê   in   ê
SFX B   ê   ès   ê
SFX B   ê   essis   ê
SFX B   ê   essin   ê
SFX B   ê   arès   ê
SFX B   ê   aressis   ê
SFX B   ê   aressin   ê
SFX B   ê   ût   ê
SFX B   ê   ûts   ê
SFX B   ê   ude   ê
SFX B   ê   udis   ê
SFX B   ê   int   ê
SFX B   ê   io   ê
SFX B   ê   istu   ê
SFX B   ê   ial   ê
SFX B   ê   ie   ê
SFX B   ê   ìno   ê
SFX B   ê   êso   ê
SFX B   ê   ino   ê
SFX B   ê   evio   ê
SFX B   ê   evistu   ê
SFX B   ê   evial   ê
SFX B   ê   evie   ê
SFX B   ê   evino   ê
SFX B   ê   eviso   ê
SFX B   ê   erio   ê
SFX B   ê   eristu   ê
SFX B   ê   erial   ê
SFX B   ê   erie   ê
SFX B   ê   erino   ê
SFX B   ê   eriso   ê
SFX B   ê   araio   ê
SFX B   ê   arâstu   ê
SFX B   ê   araial   ê
SFX B   ê   araie   ê
SFX B   ê   arìno   ê
SFX B   ê   arêso   ê
SFX B   ê   arano   ê
SFX B   ê   essio   ê
SFX B   ê   essistu   ê
SFX B   ê   essial   ê
SFX B   ê   essie   ê
SFX B   ê   essino   ê
SFX B   ê   essiso   ê
SFX B   ê   aressio   ê
SFX B   ê   aressistu   ê
SFX B   ê   aressial   ê
SFX B   ê   aressie   ê
SFX B   ê   aressino   ê
SFX B   ê   aressiso   ê

SFX C N 6
SFX C   ê   0   ê
SFX C   ê   is   ê
SFX C   ê   ìn   ê
SFX C   ê   ês   ê
SFX C   ê   in   ê
SFX C   ê   êt   ê

SFX D N 11
SFX D   adê   ât   adê
SFX D   edê   êt   edê
SFX D   alê   âl   alê
SFX D   arê   âr   arê
SFX D   asê   âs   asê
SFX D   osê   ôs   osê
SFX D   ê   is   ê
SFX D   ê   ìn   ê
SFX D   ê   ês   ê
SFX D   ê   in   ê
SFX D   ê   êt   ê

SFX E N 90
SFX E   i   evi   i
SFX E   i   evis   i
SFX E   i   eve   i
SFX E   i   evin   i
SFX E   i   ei   i
SFX E   i   eris   i
SFX E   i   è   i
SFX E   i   erin   i
SFX E   i   arai   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çarai   ci
SFX E   i   arâs   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çarâs   ci
SFX E   i   arà   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çarà   ci
SFX E   i   arìn   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çarìn   ci
SFX E   i   arês   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çarês   ci
SFX E   i   aran   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaran   ci
SFX E   i   i   i
SFX E   i   edi   i
SFX E   i   is   i
SFX E   i   edis   i
SFX E   i   edi   i
SFX E   i   ìn   i
SFX E   i   edin   i
SFX E   i   ês   i
SFX E   i   in   i
SFX E   i   ès   i
SFX E   i   essis   i
SFX E   i   essin   i
SFX E   i   arès   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çarès   ci
SFX E   i   aressis   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaressis   ci
SFX E   i   aressin   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaressin   ci
SFX E   i   int   i
SFX E   i   io   i
SFX E   i   istu   i
SFX E   i   ial   i
SFX E   i   ie   i
SFX E   i   ìno   i
SFX E   i   êso   i
SFX E   i   ino   i
SFX E   i   evio   i
SFX E   i   evistu   i
SFX E   i   evial   i
SFX E   i   evie   i
SFX E   i   evino   i
SFX E   i   eviso   i
SFX E   i   erio   i
SFX E   i   eristu   i
SFX E   i   erial   i
SFX E   i   erie   i
SFX E   i   erino   i
SFX E   i   eriso   i
SFX E   i   araio   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaraio   ci
SFX E   i   arâstu   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çarâstu   ci
SFX E   i   araial   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaraial   ci
SFX E   i   araie   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaraie   ci
SFX E   i   arìno   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çarìno   ci
SFX E   i   arêso   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çarêso   ci
SFX E   i   arano   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çarano   ci
SFX E   i   essio   i
SFX E   i   essistu   i
SFX E   i   essial   i
SFX E   i   essie   i
SFX E   i   essino   i
SFX E   i   essiso   i
SFX E   i   aressio   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaressio   ci
SFX E   i   aressistu   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaressistu   ci
SFX E   i   aressial   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaressial   ci
SFX E   i   aressie   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaressie   ci
SFX E   i   aressino   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaressino   ci
SFX E   i   aressiso   [^c]i
SFX E   ci   çaressiso   ci

SFX F N 12
SFX F   i   ût   [^c]i
SFX F   ci   çût   ci
SFX F   î   ût   î
SFX F   i   ûts   [^c]i
SFX F   ci   çûts   ci
SFX F   î   ûts   î
SFX F   i   ude   [^c]i
SFX F   ci   çude   ci
SFX F   î   ude   î
SFX F   i   udis   [^c]i
SFX F   ci   çudis   ci
SFX F   î   udis   î

SFX G N 20
SFX G   i   t   [^vzs]i
SFX G   i   ts   [^vzs]i
SFX G   i   te   [^vzs]i
SFX G   i   tis   [^vzs]i
SFX G   i   t   [^u]si
SFX G   i   ts   [^u]si
SFX G   i   te   [^u]si
SFX G   i   tis   [^u]si
SFX G   vi   t   vi
SFX G   vi   ts   vi
SFX G   vi   te   vi
SFX G   vi   tis   vi
SFX G   zi   t   zi
SFX G   zi   ts   zi
SFX G   zi   te   zi
SFX G   zi   tis   zi
SFX G   usi   ot   usi
SFX G   usi   ots   usi
SFX G   usi   ote   usi
SFX G   usi   otis   usi

SFX H N 12
SFX H   mpi   t   mpi
SFX H   mpi   ts   mpi
SFX H   mpi   te   mpi
SFX H   mpi   tis   mpi
SFX H   nzi   t   nzi
SFX H   nzi   ts   nzi
SFX H   nzi   te   nzi
SFX H   nzi   tis   nzi
SFX H   izi   et   izi
SFX H   izi   ets   izi
SFX H   izi   ete   izi
SFX H   izi   etis   izi

SFX I N 12
SFX I   i   0   [^sbdvzc]i
SFX I   si   0   si
SFX I   bi   p   bi
SFX I   di   t   di
SFX I   vi   f   vi
SFX I   zi   ç   zi
SFX I   ci   ç   ci
SFX I   i   is   i
SFX I   i   ìn   i
SFX I   i   ês   i
SFX I   i   in   i
SFX I   i   êt   i

SFX L N 21
SFX L   adi   ât   adi
SFX L   edi   êt   edi
SFX L   idi   ît   idi
SFX L   odi   ôt   odi
SFX L   udi   ût   udi
SFX L   evi   êf   evi
SFX L   ivi   îf   ivi
SFX L   ovi   ôf   ovi
SFX L   ezi   êç   ezi
SFX L   izi   îç   izi
SFX L   uzi   ûç   uzi
SFX L   asi   âs   asi
SFX L   osi   ôs   osi
SFX L   usi   ûs   usi
SFX L   ossi   òs   ossi
SFX L   essi   ès   essi
SFX L   i   is   i
SFX L   i   ìn   i
SFX L   i   ês   i
SFX L   i   in   i
SFX L   i   êt   i

SFX M N 93
SFX M   î   ìs   î
SFX M   î   issis   î
SFX M   î   ìn   î
SFX M   î   îs   î
SFX M   î   issin   î
SFX M   î   ivi   î
SFX M   î   ivis   î
SFX M   î   ive   î
SFX M   î   ivin   î
SFX M   î   ii   î
SFX M   î   iris   î
SFX M   î   ì   î
SFX M   î   irin   î
SFX M   î   irai   î
SFX M   î   issarai   î
SFX M   î   irâs   î
SFX M   î   issarâs   î
SFX M   î   irà   î
SFX M   î   issarà   î
SFX M   î   irìn   î
SFX M   î   issarìn   î
SFX M   î   irês   î
SFX M   î   issarês   î
SFX M   î   iran   î
SFX M   î   issaran   î
SFX M   î   issi   î
SFX M   î   edi   î
SFX M   î   edis   î
SFX M   î   edin   î
SFX M   î   ais   î
SFX M   î   in   î
SFX M   î   irès   î
SFX M   î   issarès   î
SFX M   î   iressis   î
SFX M   î   issaressis   î
SFX M   î   iressin   î
SFX M   î   issaressin   î
SFX M   î   ît   î
SFX M   î   îts   î
SFX M   î   ide   î
SFX M   î   idis   î
SFX M   î   int   î
SFX M   î   issio   î
SFX M   î   issistu   î
SFX M   î   issial   î
SFX M   î   issie   î
SFX M   î   ìno   î
SFX M   î   îso   î
SFX M   î   issino   î
SFX M   î   ivio   î
SFX M   î   ivistu   î
SFX M   î   ivial   î
SFX M   î   ivie   î
SFX M   î   ivino   î
SFX M   î   iviso   î
SFX M   î   irio   î
SFX M   î   iristu   î
SFX M   î   irial   î
SFX M   î   irie   î
SFX M   î   irino   î
SFX M   î   iriso   î
SFX M   î   iraio   î
SFX M   î   issaraio   î
SFX M   î   irâstu   î
SFX M   î   issarâstu   î
SFX M   î   iraial   î
SFX M   î   iraie   î
SFX M   î   issaraial   î
SFX M   î   issaraie   î
SFX M   î   irìno   î
SFX M   î   issarìno   î
SFX M   î   irêso   î
SFX M   î   issarêso   î
SFX M   î   irano   î
SFX M   î   issarano   î
SFX M   î   issio   î
SFX M   î   issistu   î
SFX M   î   issial   î
SFX M   î   issie   î
SFX M   î   issino   î
SFX M   î   issiso   î
SFX M   î   iressio   î
SFX M   î   issaressio   î
SFX M   î   iressistu   î
SFX M   î   issaressistu   î
SFX M   î   iressial   î
SFX M   î   iressie   î
SFX M   î   issaressial   î
SFX M   î   issaressie   î
SFX M   î   iressino   î
SFX M   î   issaressino   î
SFX M   î   iressiso   î
SFX M   î   issaressiso   î
