dicts/fur_IT/fur-IT.dic
aburî/M
acjadê/BD
acuarzi/IEGF
adusi/ELGF
aflizi/ELG
agjî/M
aludi/ELF
aneti/IEF
aparî/M
ardi/IEF
arsî/M
ascrivi/ELGF
assisti/IEF
assolvi/IEGF
assumi/IEF
atindi/IEF
avalê/BD
avertî/M
avierzi/IEGF
azonzi/IEGF
bati/IEF
bevi/ELF
bipartî/M
bruî/M
candî/M
cedi/ELF
cenzi/IEGF
cerni/IEF
circoscrivi/ELGF
cjadê/BD
cjoli/IEG
clarî/M
cludi/ELF
cognossi/ELF
coincidi/ELF
colorî/M
cometi/IEF
comovi/ELGF
comparê/BD
competi/IEF
complanzi/IEGF
complasê/BD
complî/M
componi/IEF
comprendi/IEF
comprimi/IEF
comprometi/IEF
concedi/ELF
concludi/ELF
concori/IEF
condividi/ELF
condusi/ELGF
coneti/IEF
confluî/M
confondi/IEF
consisti/IEF
contindi/IEF
contraponi/IEF
converzi/IEGF
convinci/IEF
convivi/ELF
conzonzi/IEGF
corezi/ELGF
corispuindi/IEF
corodi/ELF
corompi/IHE
costituî/M
costrenzi/IHEF
cressi/IEF
crodi/ELF
cuintribati/IEF
cumplî/M
cuvierzi/IEGF
davierzi/IEGF
davoni/IEG
davuelzi/IEGF
decidi/ELF
decjadi/ELF
decjadê/BD
decori/IEF
dedusi/ELGF
deludi/ELF
dentî/M
deponi/IEF
deprimi/IEF
descrivi/ELGF
dibati/IEF
difindi/IEF
dimagrî/M
dimeti/IEF
dipenzi/IEG
direzi/ELGF
discerni/IEF
discjadi/ELF
discjadê/BD
discjoli/IEG
discognossi/ELF
discomparî/M
disconeti/IEF
disconvinci/IEF
discori/IEF
discunî/M
discuvierzi/IEGF
disfridi/ELF
disfrizi/ELG
disingrisignî/M
dislidi/ELF
dismeti/IEF
dismovi/ELGF
disparê/BD
disparî/M
dispersuadê/BD
dispierdi/IEF
displasê/BbD
dissindi/IEF
dissiolzi/IEGF
dissuadi/ELF
distinzi/IEGF
distribuî/M
distridi/ELF
distruzi/ELGF
distuarzi/IEGF
disvinidrî/M
disvistî/MF
diviodi/ELF
divuelzi/IEGF
ecedi/ELF
ecuivalê/BD
elidi/ELF
eludi/ELF
emerzi/IEGF
emeti/IEF
erizi/HEL
esaudî/M
escludi/ELF
esizi/ELF
espandi/IEF
esplodi/ELF
estindi/IEF
evadi/ELF
evolvi/IEGF
falî/M
fenzi/IEGF
ferî/M
finzi/IEGF
fleti/IEF
fluî/M
fondi/IEF
fraidessi/ELF
franzi/IEGF
frenzi/IEGF
fridi/ELF
frizi/ELG
frolî/M
gjestî/M
guarnî/M
iludi/ELF
imbarî/M
imbati/IEF
imberlumî/M
imbonî/M
imbrunî/M
imerzi/IEGF
imparê/BD
impedî/M
impintî/M
imprimi/IEF
improibî/M
inacuarzi/IEGF
inasprî/M
incandî/M
incidi/ELF
incomparê/BD
incontosî/M
incressi/ELF
indaviodi/ELF
indebolî/M
indisponi/IEF
indurmidî/M
indusi/ELGF
inflapî/M
infondi/IEF
infoti/IEF
infraidî/M
ingarbî/M
ingloti/IEF
ingolosî/M
ingusî/M
inmerzi/IEGF
inombrî/M
inscrivi/ELGF
insorzi/IEGF
insospetî/M
intenerî/M
intenzi/IEGF
interompi/IHE
intiessi/ELF
intraviodi/ELF
inturgulî/M
invadi/ELF
invistî/MF
involzi/IEGF
istituî/M
jonzi/IEGF
lenzi/IEGF
lidi/eELF
madressi/ELF
malmolzi/IEGF
malpaidî/M
movi/ELGF
muardi/IEF
muî/M
nassi/IEF
nosi/ELF
nosê/BD
ocori/IEF
ofindi/IEF
onzi/IEGF
oponi/IEF
oprimi/IEF
parturî/M
parê/BbD
passi/IEF
penzi/IEG
permeti/IEF
perseguî/M
persisti/IEF
persuadi/ELF
persuadê/BD
pintî/MF
plasi/ELF
plasê/BbD
poni/IEF
ponzi/IEGF
possedê/BD
postponi/IEF
pratindi/IEF
precedi/ELF
predisponi/IEF
preludi/bELF
prescrivi/ELGF
presintî/MF
pressedê/CB
prestabilî/M
presuponi/IEF
prevalê/BD
previodi/ELF
produsi/ELGF
prometi/IEF
promovi/ELGF
proponi/IEF
protezi/ELGF
provedi/ELF
proviodi/ELF
punî/M
racolzi/IEGF
razonzi/IEGF
razunzi/IEGF
recedi/ELF
redimi/IEF
redizi/ELF
replî/M
respinzi/IEGF
rezi/ELGF
ricevi/ELF
ricjadi/ELF
ricjadê/BD
ricondusi/ELGF
ricori/IEF
ridi/bELF
riessi/ELF
rifleti/IEF
rimovi/ELGF
rincressi/ELF
rinfuarcî/M
rionzi/IEGF
riprodusi/ELGF
risolzi/IEGF
risplendi/IEF
ristrenzi/IHEF
riunî/M
rivalê/BD
riviodi/ELF
rivolzi/IEGF
rompi/IHE
sarî/M
scaltrî/M
scjadi/ELF
scjadê/BD
scludi/ELF
scludî/M
scometi/IEF
sconfizi/ELG
scori/IEF
scrivi/ELGF
scurî/M
scuvierzi/IEGF
secerni/IEF
sedusi/ELGF
semifleti/IEF
sfrenzi/IEGF
sgjarpî/M
siervi/IEF
siolzi/IEGF
smavî/M
smovi/ELGF
socombi/IEF
socori/IEF
somerzi/IEGF
soprimi/IEF
sorevivi/ELF
sorprendi/IEF
sospendi/IEF
sotponi/IEF
sotscrivi/ELGF
sozonzi/IEGF
spandi/IEF
sparlenzi/IEGF
spaurî/M
spierdi/IEF
spuarzi/IEGF
stierni/IEF
strafondi/IEF
strafuî/M
straponzi/IEGF
straviodi/ELF
strenzi/IEGF
strissignî/M
stuarzi/IEGF
sudividi/ELF
svampî/M
svendi/IEF
svistî/MF
tasê/BD
temi/IEF
temê/CB
tenzi/IEGF
tindi/IEF
trascrivi/ELGF
traslusi/ELF
trasparî/M
traviodi/ELF
travuelzi/IEGF
tuarzi/IEGF
ufindi/IEF
urdî/M
valê/BD
vati/IEF
vedê/BD
vendi/IEF
vilipendi/IbEF
viodi/ELF
vivi/ELF
zemê/CB
